Indiana, session 2026, HB1211.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-50-2-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) As used in this section, "aggravated speeding"
means operating a motor vehicle in excess of:
(1) one hundred (100) miles per hour; or
(2) thirty (30) miles per hour greater than the maximum
posted speed limit.
(b) As used in this section, "offense" means a felony described
in IC 35-42-2-2(b)(1)(B) or IC 35-42-2-2(b)(2)(B).
(c) The state may seek, on a page separate from the rest of the
charging instrument, to have a person who allegedly committed an
offense sentenced to an additional fixed term of imprisonment if
the state can show beyond a reasonable doubt that the person
knowingly or intentionally committed aggravated speeding in the
commission of the offense.
(d) If the person is convicted of the offense in a jury trial, the
jury shall reconvene to hear evidence in the enhancement hearing.
2026 IN 1211—LS 6453/DI 151


If the trial was to the court, or the judgment was entered on a
guilty plea, the court alone shall hear evidence in the enhancement
hearing.
(e) If the jury (if the hearing is by jury) or the court (if the
hearing is to the court alone) finds that the state has proven beyond
a reasonable doubt that the person knowingly or intentionally
committed aggravated speeding in the commission of the offense,
the court may sentence the person to an additional fixed term of
imprisonment of not more than five (5) years.
(f) A sentence imposed under this section shall run consecutively
to the underlying sentence.
2026 IN 1211—LS 6453/DI 151